Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 17.1 Alternate Provisions for Retirement of Teachers in State Colleges
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-17.1-1.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases as used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meanings:

“Average compensation” means the average of the annual contractual or yearly salary of an employee during the five (5) consecutive years of employment when average compensation was the highest either: (i) as an employee under the program, or (ii) as a member of the state employees retirement system.

“Board” means the board of regents for higher education.

“Employees” means presidents, professors, instructors, or other employees of the board who are eligible to participate in any retirement program by virtue of the terms of the program and who are exempt from the merit system; except as provided in this chapter, if an employee of the board who participates in the program shall change classifications, he or she shall have the option to remain with the program.

“Retirement program” and “program” means any retirement program adopted by the board of regents for higher education for any of its employees as defined in this section.

“State colleges” means the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, Community College of Rhode Island, and any other universities, colleges, or schools under the jurisdiction of the board.

“State employees retirement system” means the retirement system existing by virtue of chapters 8 — 10 of title 36 and made applicable to employees by chapter 17 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 152, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 547, § 1.

16-17.1-2.
Membership in a program.

All employees including those so employed on May 24, 1967, who have not been active members of the state employees retirement system, upon becoming eligible for membership in a program, shall be required to participate in the program.

All employees including those so employed on May 24, 1967, who become eligible for membership in a program, and who are active members of the state employees retirement system, are extended the option of continuing their active membership in the state employees retirement system or joining the program and retaining a limited membership in the state employees retirement system as set forth in this chapter and be eligible for a vested pension only as contained in this chapter. These limited members shall not be entitled to any other benefits or provisions.

All employees who become eligible for membership in the program after July 1, 1967, shall make their election within sixty (60) days after they become eligible for participation in the program. All employees not exercising the option to join a program shall be deemed to have chosen to continue active membership in the state employees retirement system in lieu of exercising the option to participate under the program.

Any employee who was a member of the program as an employee of the board, who subsequently enters the employees retirement system as a member by virtue of his or her employment, may have the option to purchase credit for any prior service with the board under the program, provided that he or she pays into the retirement system in a lump sum:

The amount he or she would have contributed to the system had he or she been a member during his or her service, plus regular interest; and

The amount of the state’s contribution to the program for his or her service, plus regular interest; and

Provided further that these payments shall be made within the employee’s first year of membership in the retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 152, § 3; P.L. 1973, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 547, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 37.

16-17.1-3.
Optional withdrawal of contributions to retirement system upon participation in another program — Notice.

An employee who elects to participate in a program as provided under §

16-17.1-2(b)

may further elect to withdraw the total amount of all contributions he or she has made to the state employees retirement system, provided that the state retirement board shall be notified in writing of the employee’s intent to withdraw his or her contributions within ninety (90) days of the date upon which the employee becomes eligible to participate in a program. Upon the withdrawal of funds, which shall be effected within ninety (90) days following the state retirement board’s receipt of notice that the employee is participating under a program, the employee shall thereby forfeit and relinquish all accrued rights as a member of the state employees retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 152, § 3.

16-17.1-4.
Continuing membership in retirement system upon participation in another program.

An employee who has elected to participate in a program in accordance with the provisions of §

16-17.1-2(b)

and who has not withdrawn his or her contribution as provided in §

16-17.1-3

shall continue to be a member of the state employees retirement system and service with the state colleges while participating in the program shall be considered as service under the system; provided, however, that the employee shall be required to make no further contributions to the system and provided further that should the employee leave the employ of the state or become employed by the state in a capacity which does not qualify him or her for membership in the state employees retirement system before he or she has completed ten (10) years of service as an employee under a program or as a member of the state employees retirement system, he or she shall have the right pursuant to §

36-10-8

to obtain a refund of his or her own contributions made under the state employees retirement system from the state retirement board without interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 152, § 3.

16-17.1-5.
Method of computing benefits under state employees retirement system for employees in a program.

Where an employee has elected to participate in a program in accordance with the provisions of §

16-17.1-2(b)

, only the years of the employee’s service prior to making the election to participate under the program shall be considered as years of service for the purposes of computing the benefits available under the state employees retirement system pursuant to chapter 10 of title 36, provided that for the purpose of determining an employee’s service retirement allowance pursuant to §

36-10-10

, average compensation shall be determined in accordance with §

16-17.1-1(1)

notwithstanding anything contained in the general laws to the contrary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 152, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 49.

16-17.1-6.
Retirement age.

An employee, notwithstanding the program he or she elects to participate in, shall not be required to retire at any age less than the maximum age as established in § 36-10-9(b).

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 520, § 3.